Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5005
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the Children of Nebraska Hearing Aid Act.

Laws 2019, LB15, § 5.